Maine, session 132, LD2037.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §580-B, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2017, c. 323, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Base annual budget. Until January 1, 2014, the base annual carbon dioxide
emissions budget is established at 5,948,902 tons of carbon dioxide. For the year 2014, the
base annual carbon dioxide emissions budget is established at 3,277,250 tons of carbon
dioxide. Beginning with the year 2015, the annual carbon dioxide emissions budget must
decline by 2.5% each year through the year 2020. For the year 2021, the department shall
establish the base annual carbon dioxide emissions budget in accordance with the model
rule and with rules adopted pursuant to subsection 4. Beginning with the year 2022, the
annual carbon dioxide emissions budget must decline by 2.5% of the 2014 base annual
carbon dioxide emissions budget each year through the year 2030 2026. Beginning with
the year 2027, the base annual carbon dioxide emissions budgets are as follows.
A. For the year 2027, the base annual carbon dioxide emissions budget is 2,065,595
tons.
B. For the year 2028, the base annual carbon dioxide emissions budget is 1,807,395
tons.
C. For the year 2029, the base annual carbon dioxide emissions budget is 1,549,196
tons.
D. For the year 2030, the base annual carbon dioxide emissions budget is 1,290,997
tons.
E. For the year 2031, the base annual carbon dioxide emissions budget is 1,032,797
tons.
F. For the year 2032, the base annual carbon dioxide emissions budget is 774,598 tons.
G. For the year 2033, the base annual carbon dioxide emissions budget is 516,399
tons.
Page 1 - 132LR2656(02)

H. For the year 2034, the base annual carbon dioxide emissions budget is 442,627
tons.
I. For the year 2035, the base annual carbon dioxide emissions budget is 368,856 tons.
J. For the year 2036, the base annual carbon dioxide emissions budget is 295,085 tons.
K. For the year 2037 and each subsequent year, the base annual carbon dioxide
emissions budget is 221,314 tons.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §580-B, sub-§4, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 317, §17, is
repealed.
Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §580-B, sub-§10, ¶D, as repealed and replaced by PL 2009, c.
652, Pt. A, §61, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 38 MRSA §580-C, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 317, §17, is amended
to read:
1. Withdrawal by State. The ability of this State to withdraw from the regional
greenhouse gas initiative; or.
Sec. 5. 38 MRSA §580-C, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 317, §17, is repealed.
Page 2 - 132LR2656(02)